test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AHL_STEM_2

     áljahl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljalga
     áljahl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljalgang
     áljahl+V+DIRECT+PAST: áljalgan
     áljahl+V+NON_FACTIVE: áljal.ang
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang
     áljahl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalganggang
     áljahl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljalgangang
     áljahl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljalgiinii
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljalgaangaa
     áljahl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljalgaangaan
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasa'áa
     áljahl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasa'áang
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaasdláa
     áljahl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaasdláang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang'waa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang'waang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljalgang'waa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang'anggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljalgang'angang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaa'áng
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaa'ánggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaasdlä'áng
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljalang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang'ang'waa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljalgang'ang'waang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljalgang'ang'waa.ang
